Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that Washington state is home to over 500 bird species that play a critical role in building and maintaining healthy ecosystems through pollination, predation, scavenging, seed dispersal, and habitat engineering. The legislature also finds that light pollution caused by the proliferation of artificial light disrupts natural systems and disorients birds resulting in collisions with buildings, especially during migration. Eliminating or reducing unnecessary lighting can save energy and reduce costs while simultaneously improving bird migration. The legislature further finds that buildings may be designed to incorporate eco-friendly practices such using bird-safe glass and reducing nighttime lighting to help prevent bird collisions. Therefore, the legislature intends that during peak migration in the months of April, May, September, and October, nonessential lighting should be turned off to reduce energy consumption and provide birds safer passage between their nesting and wintering grounds and that incentives should be established within Washington's LEED standard to promote eco-friendly building practices that reduce bird collisions.Sec. 2. RCW 1.16.050 and 2025 c 58 s 1001 and 2025 c 30 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The following are state legal holidays:(a) Sunday;(b) The first day of January, commonly called New Year's Day;(c) The third Monday of January, celebrated as the anniversary of the birth of Martin Luther King, Jr.;(d) The third Monday of February, to be known as Presidents' Day and celebrated as the anniversary of the births of Abraham Lincoln and George Washington;(e) The last Monday of May, commonly known as Memorial Day;(f) The nineteenth day of June, recognized as Juneteenth, a day of remembrance for the day the African slaves learned of their freedom;(g) The fourth day of July, the anniversary of the Declaration of Independence;(h) The first Monday in September, to be known as Labor Day;(i) The eleventh day of November, to be known as Veterans Day;(j) The fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Thanksgiving Day;(k) The Friday immediately following the fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Native American Heritage Day; and(l) The twenty-fifth day of December, commonly called Christmas Day.(2) Employees of the state and its political subdivisions, except employees of school districts and except those nonclassified employees of institutions of higher education who hold appointments or are employed under contracts to perform services for periods of less than twelve consecutive months, are entitled to one paid holiday per calendar year in addition to those specified in this section. Each employee of the state or its political subdivisions may select the day on which the employee desires to take the additional holiday provided for in this section after consultation with the employer pursuant to guidelines to be promulgated by rule of the appropriate personnel authority, or in the case of local government by ordinance or resolution of the legislative authority.(3) Employees of the state and its political subdivisions, including employees of school districts and those nonclassified employees of institutions of higher education who hold appointments or are employed under contracts to perform services for periods of less than twelve consecutive months, are entitled to two unpaid holidays per calendar year for a reason of faith or conscience or an organized activity conducted under the auspices of a religious denomination, church, or religious organization. This includes employees of public institutions of higher education, including community colleges, technical colleges, and workforce training programs. The employee may select the days on which the employee desires to take the two unpaid holidays after consultation with the employer pursuant to guidelines to be promulgated by rule of the appropriate personnel authority, or in the case of local government by ordinance or resolution of the legislative authority. If an employee prefers to take the two unpaid holidays on specific days for a reason of faith or conscience, or an organized activity conducted under the auspices of a religious denomination, church, or religious organization, the employer must allow the employee to do so unless the employee's absence would impose an undue hardship on the employer or the employee is necessary to maintain public safety. Undue hardship shall have the meaning established in rule by the office of financial management under RCW 43.41.109.(4) If any of the state legal holidays specified in this section are also federal legal holidays but observed on different dates, only the state legal holidays are recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees of the state and its political subdivisions. However, for port districts and the law enforcement and public transit employees of municipal corporations, either the federal or the state legal holiday is recognized as a paid legal holiday, but in no case may both holidays be recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees.(5) Whenever any state legal holiday:(a) Other than Sunday, falls upon a Sunday, the following Monday is the legal holiday; or(b) Falls upon a Saturday, the preceding Friday is the legal holiday.(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to have the effect of adding or deleting the number of paid holidays provided for in an agreement between employees and employers of political subdivisions of the state or as established by ordinance or resolution of the local government legislative authority.(7) The legislature declares that the following days and months are recognized as provided in this subsection, but may not be considered legal holidays for any purpose:(a) The eleventh day of January, recognized as human trafficking awareness day;(b) The thirteenth day of January, recognized as Korean American day;(c) The date corresponding with the second new moon following the winter solstice, or the third new moon following the winter solstice should an intercalary month intervene, recognized as the lunar new year;(d) The twenty-sixth day of January, recognized as Washington army and air national guard day;(e) The nineteenth day of February, recognized as civil liberties day of remembrance;(f) The ninth day of March, recognized as Billy Frank Jr. day;(g) The thirtieth day of March, recognized as welcome home Vietnam veterans day;(h) The thirty-first day of March, recognized as Cesar Chavez day;(i) The ninth day of April, recognized as former prisoner of war recognition day;(j) The tenth day of April, recognized as Dolores Huerta day;(k) The sixteenth day of April, recognized as Mother Joseph day;(l) The fifteenth day of May, recognized as water safety day;(m) The twenty-seventh day of July, recognized as national Korean war veterans armistice day;(n) The seventh day of August, recognized as purple heart recipient recognition day;(o) The fourth day of September, recognized as Marcus Whitman day;(p) The fourth Saturday of September, recognized as public lands day;(q) The second Sunday in October, recognized as Washington state children's day;(r) The twelfth day of October, recognized as Columbus day;(s) The seventh day of December, recognized as Pearl Harbor remembrance day;(t) The eighteenth day of December, recognized as blood donor day;(u) The first day of the tenth month of the Islamic calendar, which is lunar-cycle based and shifts by approximately 10 to 11 days each year, commonly called Eid al-Fitr; ((and))(v) The tenth day of the twelfth month of the Islamic calendar, which is lunar-cycle based and shifts by approximately 10 to 11 days each year, commonly called Eid al-Adha; and(w) The months of April, May, September, and October, recognized as lights out for birds.Sec. 3. RCW 39.35D.030 and 2025 c 414 s 8031 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All major facility projects of public agencies receiving any funding in a state capital budget, or projects financed through a financing contract as defined in RCW 39.94.020, must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard. This subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the design phase prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.(2) All major facility projects of any entity other than a public agency or public school district receiving any funding in a state capital budget must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard. This subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the grant application process prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.(3)(a) Public agencies, under this section, shall monitor and document ongoing operating savings resulting from major facility projects designed, constructed, and certified as required under this section.(b) Public agencies, under this section, shall report annually to the department on major facility projects and operating savings.(4) The department shall consolidate the reports required in subsection (3) of this section into one report and report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the department shall also report on the implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED standard was not used as required by RCW 39.35D.020(5)(b). The department shall make recommendations regarding the ongoing implementation of this chapter, including a discussion of incentives and disincentives related to implementing this chapter.(5) For the purposes of determining compliance with the requirement for a project to be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard, the department must credit one additional point for a project that uses wood products with a credible third-party sustainable forest certification or from forests regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act. For projects that qualify for this additional point, and for which an additional point would have resulted in formal certification under the LEED silver standard, the project must be deemed to meet the standard under this section.(6) For the purposes of determining compliance with the requirement for a project to be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard, the department must credit one additional point for a project that uses bird-safe materials and one additional point for a project that employs strategies that reduce nighttime lighting to prevent disorienting migratory birds. For projects that qualify for these additional points, and for which additional points would have resulted in formal certification under the LEED silver standard, the project must be deemed to meet the standard under this section.(7) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, an alternative high-performance building certification, as determined by the legislature, may be used instead of the LEED silver building design, construction, and certification standard required by this section.Sec. 4. RCW 43.19.682 and 2015 c 225 s 68 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The director of the department of enterprise services shall seek to further energy conservation objectives among other landscape objectives in planting and maintaining trees upon grounds administered by the department.(2)(a) The director of the department of enterprise services shall seek to further energy conservation objectives and promote bird collision deterrence at state facilities by turning off nonessential outdoor lighting at state facilities between the hours of 10:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. and require the following measures in state buildings where new building construction, renovation, or maintenance activities are needed including: (i) Down-shield exterior lighting to eliminate horizontal glare and upward light; (ii) installing automatic motion sensors and controls when possible; and (iii) when converting to new lighting, assess quality and quantity of light needed to avoid over-lighting with newer, brighter, short wavelength technology.(b) For the purposes of this section, "nonessential outdoor lighting" means lighting that has not been deemed essential for either safety or functionality, as determined by a state agency head.--- END ---